District of Columbia statutes.
5-133.04a

Watchmen at Municipal Building.

Policemen shall not be detailed for duty as watchmen at the Municipal Building.

Mar. 3, 1909, 35 Stat. 689, ch. 250
as added June 16, 2006, D.C. Law 16-127, § 2, 53 DCR 4712